Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2535.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Commercial Data Center Public Safety Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Building code official." A construction code official certified in accordance with the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, to administer and enforce the Uniform Construction Code.123456789101112131415161718 "Emergency operations floor plan." A schematic document indicating the spatial layout of a large load user that identifies the:(1) Location of all emergency power shutoff switches.(2) Aisle containment systems and egress paths.(3) Battery storage rooms, including battery chemistry types.(4) Fire suppression system zones and manual activation points.(5) Locations of bulk storage for cooling agents, refrigerants or diesel fuel."Generalized infrastructure inventory." A nonproprietary summary of the physical assets within the facility that pose potential thermal or chemical hazards, including:(1) The aggregate quantity and chemistry of uninterruptible power supply battery systems.(2) The type and volume of cooling agents or refrigerants used in thermal management systems.(3) The approximate density of server racks per square foot.(4) The presence of any immersion cooling systems involving dielectric fluids."Large load user." A facility, campus of facilities or array of interconnected facilities in this Commonwealth that meets all of the following criteria:(1) Is used by a business entity or other enterprise to operate, manage or maintain a computer, group of computers or other organized assembly of hardware and software for the primary purpose of processing, storing, retrieving or transmitting data.20260HB2535PN3435 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Has a peak demand of 25 megawatts or greater."Local fire official." All of the following that have primary jurisdiction over the municipality in which the large load user is located:(1) The county emergency management coordinator.(2) The local emergency management coordinator.(3) The fire chief or designated officer in charge of the fire department or volunteer fire company.Section 3. Conditions for certificate of occupancy.(a) Requirement.--A building code official may not issue a certificate of occupancy for a large load user unless the applicant has demonstrated compliance with the reporting requirements of this section and with the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act.(b) Submission to local fire official.--Prior to the issuance of a certificate of occupancy, the owner or operator of a large load user shall submit the following to the local fire official with jurisdiction over the facility:(1) The emergency operations floor plan.(2) The generalized infrastructure inventory.(c) Proof of compliance.--The applicant shall provide the building code official with written proof that the documents required under subsection (b) have been received by the local fire official. Proof of compliance may include:(1) a signed receipt or written acknowledgment from the local fire official; or(2) proof of delivery via certified mail or a confirmed electronic transmission to the official address of the fire department.20260HB2535PN3435 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. Annual updates and material changes.(a) Annual verification.--On or before March 1 of each year following the issuance of the certificate of occupancy, the operator of a large load user shall submit an updated generalized infrastructure inventory to the local fire official or a written statement certifying that no material changes have occurred since the previous submission.(b) Material changes.--In the event of a significant modification to the facility, including an increase in power load exceeding 20% or a change in the type of battery chemistry or cooling agents used, the operator shall submit an updated emergency operations floor plan to the local fire official within 30 days of the modification.Section 5. Confidentiality of security information.(a) Public safety exemption.--Information submitted under this act, including floor plans and infrastructure inventories, shall be considered confidential security information and shall be exempt from disclosure under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, to the extent that the disclosure would be reasonably likely to jeopardize the safety or physical security of the facility or critical infrastructure.(b) Limited access.--Access to the information submitted under this act shall be limited to:(1) The building code official for permitting purposes.(2) The local fire official and emergency response personnel for planning and response purposes.(3) Law enforcement officials having jurisdiction.Section 6. Enforcement and penalties.(a) Authority.--The building code official of the 20260HB2535PN3435 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 municipality in which the large load user is located shall have the authority to enforce the provisions of this act.(b) Compliance orders.--Upon discovery of a violation of this act, including failure to submit the initial inventory or failure to provide the annual update required under section 4, the building code official shall issue a written notice of violation and an order to comply to the owner or operator. The order shall grant the operator a period of not more than 30 days to correct the violation.(c) Civil penalties.--If the violation is not corrected within the period specified in the order to comply, the owner or operator shall be subject to a civil penalty of:(1) Not more than $10,000 for the first offense.(2) Not more than $5,000 for each day the violation continues after the initial penalty is assessed.(d) Disposition of penalties.--All civil penalties collected under this act shall be retained by the municipality to defray the costs of code enforcement and fire protection services.(e) Revocation of occupancy.--In the event of a willful or persistent refusal to comply with the reporting requirements of this act, the building code official may suspend or revoke the certificate of occupancy for the facility in accordance with the procedures established under the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act.Section 7. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to:(1) Limit the authority of a municipality to enact ordinances imposing stricter fire safety or reporting requirements.20260HB2535PN3435 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Exempt a large load user from any other reporting requirements under the act of December 7, 1990 (P.L.639, No.165), known as the Hazardous Material Emergency Planning and Response Act, if applicable.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2535PN3435 - 6 - 123456